Utah statutes.
31A-8a-203.   Information filed with the department.

(1)  Prior to operating a health discount program, a person shall submit the following to the commissioner:

(a)  a copy of contract forms used by the health discount program for:

(i)  health care providers or health care provider networks participating in the health discount program, including the discounts for medical services provided to enrollees;

(ii)  marketing;

(iii)  administration of the health discount program;

(iv)  enrollment;

(v)  investment management for the health discount programs; and

(vi)  subcontracts for any services;

(b)  the program's proposed marketing plan; and

(c)  dispute resolution procedures for program holders.

(2)  The company shall file prior to use:

(a)  the form of contracts used by the health discount program operator;

(b)  the marketing plan; and

(c)  dispute resolution procedures.

(3)  The commissioner may adopt rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to implement this section.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

